test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_vyelgidkyettid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - vyelgeškyettiđ: # generated from FST

    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Inf: vyelgiškyettiđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vyelgiškuáđám
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vyelgiškuáđáh
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vyelgiškuát
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vyelgiškyetteen
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vyelgiškyetvettee
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vyelgiškyettev
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vyelgiškyettip
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vyelgiškyetvetteđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vyelgiškyeteh

    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vyelgiškyettim
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vyelgiškyetih
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vyelgiškuođij
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vyelgiškuođijm
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vyelgiškuođijd
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vyelgiškuođijn
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vyelgiškuođijm
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vyelgiškyeđid
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vyelgiškuottii

    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: vyelgiškuáđáččim
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: vyelgiškuáđáččih
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: vyelgiškuáđáččij
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: vyelgiškuáđáččáim
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: vyelgiškuáđáččáid
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: vyelgiškuáđáččáin
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: vyelgiškuáđáččijm
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: vyelgiškuáđáččijd
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: vyelgiškuáđáččii

    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Sg1: vyelgiškyetđeem
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Sg2: vyelgiškyetđeeh
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Sg3: vyelgiškuođiš
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Du1: vyelgiškuođižeen
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Du2: vyelgiškuođišvettee
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Du3: vyelgiškuođižává
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Pl1: vyelgiškuođižep
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Pl2: vyelgiškuođišvetteđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+Pl3: vyelgiškuođižeh

    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Sg2: vyelgiškyeđi
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Sg3: vyelgiškuáđus
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Du1: vyelgiškuáttoon
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Du2: vyelgiškyettee
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Du3: vyelgiškuáttus
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Pl1: vyelgiškuáttup
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Pl2: vyelgiškyettiđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Imprt+Pl3: vyelgiškuáttus

    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vyelgiškyeđi
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vyelgiškyeđi
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vyelgiškuáttám
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Pot+ConNeg: vyelgiškuátđáá
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+PrsPrc: vyelgiškyettee
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+PrfPrc: vyelgiškuáttám
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Actio: vyelgiškyettim
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Actio+Ess: vyelgiškyettimin
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Actio+Loc: vyelgiškyettimist
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+Actio+Ill: vyelgiškyettimân
    vyelgiđ+V+Der/kyetti+V+VAbess: vyelgiškyeđihánnáá
